Utah statutes.
57-19-24.   Violation of Consumer Sales Practice Act.

For purposes of applying Title 13, Chapter 11, the Consumer Sales Practices Act, any material violation of the provisions of this chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce.

